Utah statutes.
34-46-203.   Retention of information collected during an initial selection
process.
(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), with regard to information collected about an
applicant obtained through an initial selection process, an employer shall:
(a)  maintain a specific policy regarding the retention, disposition, access,
and confidentiality of the information; and
(b)  if an applicant requests to see the policy described in Subsection
(1)(a), provide an opportunity for the applicant to review the policy before
being required to provide information as part of the initial selection
process.
(2)  Except to the extent required by law, an employer may not retain the
information described in Subsection (1) more than two years after the day on
which the applicant provides the information to the employer, if the employer
does not hire the applicant within that two-year period.
